District of Columbia statutes.
29-409.08

Abandonment of a merger or membership exchange.

(a)

Unless otherwise provided in a plan of merger or membership exchange or in the organic law of a foreign nonprofit corporation that is a party to a merger or a membership exchange, after the plan has been adopted and approved as required by this subchapter, and at any time before the merger or membership exchange has become effective, it may be abandoned by a domestic nonprofit corporation that is a party thereto without action by its members, in accordance with any procedures set forth in the plan of merger or membership exchange or, if no such procedures are set forth in the plan, in the manner determined by the board of directors, subject to any contractual rights of other parties to the merger or membership exchange.

(b)

If a merger or membership exchange is abandoned under subsection (a) of this section after articles of merger or membership exchange have been delivered to the Mayor for filing but before the merger or membership exchange has become effective, a statement that the merger or membership exchange has been abandoned in accordance with this section, executed on behalf of a party to the merger or membership exchange by an officer or other duly authorized representative, shall be delivered to the Mayor for filing prior to the effective date of the merger or membership exchange. Upon filing, the statement shall be effective and the merger or membership exchange shall be deemed abandoned and shall not become effective.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(d)(18), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “delivered to the Mayor for filing” for “filed with the Mayor” in (b).
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.